District of Columbia statutes.
42-3502.04b

Transfer of functions of the Rental Accommodations and Conversion Division of the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs to the Department of Housing and Community Development.

All positions, property, records, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, assessments, and other funds available or to be made available to the Rental Accommodations and Conversion Division of the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs relating to the duties and functions assigned to the Division pursuant to § 42-3502.03(a) are transferred to the Department of Housing and Community Development.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 203a
as added Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 2003(d), 54 DCR 7052
redesignated § 204b, Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-366, § 2(c), 56 DCR 1332
2001 Ed., § 42-3502.03a
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2003(d) of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
Former § 42-3502.03a has been recodified as § 42-3502.04b by D.C. Law 17-366, § 2(c).